arapahoverbs.lexc
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@no'otoo'ei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^no'otoo'ei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@no'otoo'oe@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^no'otoo'oe^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiiyoo3tonoun@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiiyoo3tonoun^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiiyoo3tii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiiyoo3tii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiiyoo3oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiiyoo3oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiiyoo3nii3in@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiiyoo3nii3in^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiiyoo3itii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiiyoo3itii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@behcowo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^behcowo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiisiitoh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiisiitoh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hiii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hiii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hihoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hihoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hooxono'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hooxono'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hihco'ooton@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hihco'ooton^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@wooniii'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^wooniii'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@wooneihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^wooneihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@woonee'in@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^woonee'in^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nihiitooni@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nihiitooni^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nihiis@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nihiis^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nihiit@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TI@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nihiit^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nihiinoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nihiinoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nihiitee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nihiitee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noxohoetoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noxohoetoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noxohu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noxohu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@noxohoenoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^noxohoenoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@teyeiw@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^teyeiw^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bee3ci3@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bee3ci3^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bebiiseiti@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bebiiseiti^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@hoo3sine@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^hoo3sine^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bii3hiih@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bii3hiih^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@tooyou'uuwu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^tooyou'uuwu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@tooyouni@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^tooyouni^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@toyotetouuhu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^toyotetouuhu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@soo3oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^soo3oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@soo3oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^soo3oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@sooso'oowoo'oo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^sooso'oowoo'oo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@tei'ooni@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^tei'ooni^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@tei'oowu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^tei'oowu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@tei'ookuu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^tei'ookuu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@tei'oon@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^tei'oon^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@siikoo'ei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^siikoo'ei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@tootookuuw@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^tootookuuw^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@siikooceisi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^siikooceisi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@boo'einih'ebi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^boo'einih'ebi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@neniineee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^neniineee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@tii'oh@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.TA@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^tii'oh^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@koxceeyoti@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^koxceeyoti^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ciino3ihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ciino3ihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ce3i3o3hi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ce3i3o3hi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ciino'oniitoxu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ciino'oniitoxu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@niitouunooni@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^niitouunooni^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@cebtouute@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^cebtouute^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@no'ookootii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^no'ookootii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@neyeisniiihi@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^neyeisniiihi^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@heniisiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^heniisiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@heniisiiyoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^heniisiiyoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@nii3oyeise@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^nii3oyeise^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@3i'eiite@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^3i'eiite^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@no'oo'uxootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^no'oo'uxootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@bestii@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^bestii^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@besoowuu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^besoowuu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@besooyoo@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^besooyoo^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@besoonobee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^besoonobee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@besootiini@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^besootiini^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@heneitootee@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^heneitootee^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@niisootoxe@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.II@@U.RegularII.Yes@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^niisootoxe^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@wo'teenooxebei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^wo'teenooxebei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@niisootoxu@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^niisootoxu^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ciihouuti@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ciihouuti^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@ciiciihei@U.StemFinal.Yes@:@U.StemType.AI@@U.ExceptionAI.No@@U.StemInitial.Yes@^ciiciihei^@U.StemFinal.Yes@		OrderInflection;
